New Jersey, session 221, S2435.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 4 of P.L.1992, c.143 (C.26:2K-57) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  The commissioner, in accordance with recommendations adopted by the council, and within the limits of those monies in the fund, shall annually reimburse any private agency, organization, or entity which is certified by the commissioner to provide training and testing for [volunteer] ambulance, first aid and rescue squad personnel who are seeking certification or recertification as a volunteer emergency medical [technician-ambulance, or EMT-A, or emergency medical technician-defibrillation, or EMT-D, certification or recertification, or an entity which provides an educational program in the administration of epinephrine auto-injector devices that is approved by the commissioner pursuant to P.L.2003, c.1 (C.26:2K-47.1 et al.), and] technician, for which costs that agency, organization, or entity is not otherwise reimbursed.  An agency, organization, or entity that provides training and testing to volunteer emergency medical technicians and volunteer emergency medical technician candidates shall be eligible for reimbursement from the fund regardless of whether the ambulance, first aid and rescue squad employing or utilizing the services of the volunteer emergency medical technician receives any payment or reimbursement for providing emergency medical services.  The priority for reimbursement from the fund to an agency, organization, or entity for training and testing of [volunteer] ambulance, first aid and rescue squad personnel shall be in the following order:  [EMT-A certification, EMT-A recertification, EMT-D certification, EMT-D recertification and certification to administer epinephrine auto-injector devices pursuant to P.L.2003, c.1 (C.26:2K-47.1 et al.)] initial emergency medical technician certification and emergency medical technician refresher recertification classes. b.    All reimbursements from the fund shall be promptly paid upon receipt of a qualifying application for reimbursement, which payment shall be made to the agency, organization, or entity that provided training to the volunteer emergency medical technician. c.     (1)  The head of the ambulance, first aid and rescue squad employing or utilizing the services of an emergency medical technician, who received initial emergency medical technician training from an agency, organization, or entity that received reimbursement from the fund for providing the initial emergency medical technician training to that emergency medical technician, shall determine the emergency medical technician to be a volunteer in good standing provided that the emergency medical technician works at least one service call per month during the initial three-year certification period as a volunteer emergency medical technician. (2)   The head of the ambulance, first aid and rescue squad shall seek reimbursement from the emergency medical technician, if the emergency medical technician ceases to be a volunteer in good standing, for monies paid out of the fund in connection with that emergency medical technicians training, testing, certification, or recertification, as appropriate, in connection with the initial three-year certification period in which the emergency medical technician ceased to be a volunteer in good standing.  The Department of Health shall exercise oversight authority over the collection of funds pursuant to this paragraph. d.    As used in this section, volunteer emergency medical technician means an emergency medical technician who provides basic life support services without receiving compensation in the form of an hourly wage, a salary, or any other form of financial remuneration provided for or in connection with the provision of basic life support services. 1A volunteer emergency medical technician shall not include an individual employed full-time by a general or special hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) as an emergency medical technician.1 (cf: P.L.2003, c.1, s.9) 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as shall be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3. This act shall take effect 1[180 days] on the first day of the seventh month1 after the date of the enactment.